Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.926

Transfer of ownership of institution-owned vessel—Further requirements.

(1) Following the inspection required under RCW 28B.10.925 and prior to transferring ownership of an institution-owned vessel, the institution of higher education shall obtain the following from the transferee:

(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the vessel; and

(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined by the institution of higher education.

(2)(a) The institution of higher education shall remove any containers or other materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous substances, as defined under RCW 70A.305.020.

(b) However, the institution of higher education may transfer a vessel with:

(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the institution of higher education's satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent with the anticipated use of the vessel; and

(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the institution of higher education, based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and anticipated use of the vessel including initial destination following transfer.

(c) The institution of higher education may consult with the department of ecology in carrying out the requirements of this subsection.

(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid marine document, the institution of higher education is required to apply for a certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

[ 2021 c 65 s 21; 2013 c 291 s 26.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.